Florida, session 2026, SB334.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (a) through (h) of subsection 23 (1) of section 627.748, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 24 paragraphs (b) through (i), respectively, a new paragraph (a) is 25 added to that subsection, and subsection (19) is added to that 26 section, to read: 27 627.748âTransportation network companies.â 28 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 29 (a)ââDeactivationâ means a process by which a TNC driver is 30 no longer authorized to accept rides through the digital network 31 and has his or her access to the TNC digital network revoked. 32 (19)âDEACTIVATION.âDeactivation may occur when a TNC driver 33 receives poor rider ratings, violates the TNCâs safety or other 34 policies, or fails to meet vehicle or insurance requirements. A 35 TNC must establish and maintain a clear, written deactivation 36 policy. This policy must provide TNC drivers with the 37 opportunity to appeal deactivation. The TNC must contract with a 38 nonprofit organization that has experience working with diverse 39 populations to assist drivers in navigating the appeals process. 40 The TNC must review any appeal by the TNC driver and issue a 41 determination on deactivation within 30 days after receiving the 42 appeal. In making this determination, the TNC must assess 43 whether the evidence supports the determination that the driver 44 violated the TNCâs policies. Deactivated drivers may appeal any 45 deactivation before a mutually agreed upon third-party 46 arbitrator who is a member in good standing of the American 47 Arbitration Association (AAA) or its successor. If the TNC and 48 the deactivated driver cannot agree on an arbitrator, the 49 parties must obtain a list of five arbitrators recommended by 50 the AAA. To select the arbitrator, the TNC and the deactivated 51 driver shall alternate striking one name from the list until 52 only one remains, who will serve as the arbitrator. This 53 subsection does not preclude a TNC driver from bringing a cause 54 of action against the TNC in a court of competent jurisdiction 55 regarding the circumstances of a deactivation. 56 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.